California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Stop-Sale Orders [52391. - 52395.]

52391.

The secretary or the commissioner and any qualified representative of the commissioner may issue and enforce a written or printed “stop-sale” order to the owner or custodian of any lot of agricultural or vegetable seed that he or she finds is in violation of any provision of this chapter, that shall prohibit further sale of the seed until the officer has evidence that the law has been complied with. Upon compliance, the order shall be removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52392.

It is unlawful for any person to move or otherwise dispose of any lot of seed which is held under a “stop-sale” order except under written permission of an enforcing officer or under his specific direction and for the purposes which are specified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52393.

The owner or custodian of seed which is held under a “stop sale” order shall, upon demand, have the right to a hearing before the director or the commissioner as to the justification of any such order, and may appeal to the director from any order of the commissioner made under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52394.

This article does not limit the right of the enforcement officer to proceed as authorized by other sections of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52395.

Any decision of the director pursuant to this article is subject to review by any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Seed-certifying Agencies [52401. - 52406.]

52401.

The secretary shall, by regulation, establish a list of seed-certifying agencies that the secretary finds qualified to certify as to the variety, purity, quality, type, strain, or other genetic character of agricultural or vegetable seed. The secretary shall consult with the director of the University of California Agricultural Experiment Station before approving the qualifications of any seed-certifying agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52402.

A seed-certifying agency may conduct or fund research projects that the agency, in its sole discretion, deems beneficial to the seed industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52403.

Each seed-certifying agency shall establish a schedule of fees, in its discretion with input from the seed industry, for certification services provided and research conducted pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52404.

Notwithstanding Section 52321, fees collected pursuant to this article shall be paid directly to the seed-certifying agency and shall be expended only for a purpose authorized by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52405.

A seed-certifying agency, pursuant to procedures adopted by the seed-certifying agency, may impose a late charge on any person who fails to pay any fee required by this article within the time required by the seed-certifying agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

52406.

In addition to any late charge, a seed-certifying agency, pursuant to procedures adopted by the seed-certifying agency, may suspend certification services to any person who fails to timely pay any fee or late charge required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 715, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Services [52421. - 52422.]

52421.

The director and the commissioner of each county acting under the supervision of the director may do all of the following:

(a) Cooperate with seed-certifying agencies which are officially recognized under the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Supervise the harvesting, cleaning, and packaging of any seed which is eligible for certification, and the affixing of labels and seals to it.

(c) Examine, sample, and test such seeds.

(d) Perform such other services as may be necessary to maintain the identity and quality of certified seed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52422.

The director, or any commissioner with the approval of the director, may annually enter into a cooperative agreement with a qualified seed certification agency for the services that they are authorized to perform, based upon the approximate cost of the services. The approximate cost of the services rendered shall be based on applications to grow certified seed, and certified seed conditioners’ activities within the county, as determined by the cooperating seed certification agency. Upon the request of a recognized seed-certifying agency, the director, through the director’s staff or through the commissioners, may perform the services authorized by this article. Compensation for services performed by a commissioner shall be transmitted to the commissioner for such disposition as may be directed by the board of supervisors. Compensation for services that are performed by the director shall be paid into the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 277, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Labeling of Seeds [52451. - 52456.]

52451.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Seed or grain that is not intended for sowing purposes.

(b) Seed that is in storage in, or consigned to, a seed cleaning or conditioning establishment for cleaning or conditioning.

(c) Seed or grain that is transported without transfer of title for sowing on land that is owned by the person by whom the seed or grain was produced.

(d) Seed that is weighed and packaged in the presence of the purchaser from a bulk container, if the container is
 properly and conspicuously labeled as provided by this chapter.

(e) Seed or grain that is transported from one warehouse to another without transfer of title or in storage in a warehouse, if each container is plainly marked or identified with a lot number or other lot identification and the label information that is required by this article is available at the request of an enforcing officer.

(f) Seed distributed or received by noncommercial seed sharing activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 259, Sec. 5.   (AB 1810)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52452.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 52454, each container of agricultural seed that is for sale or sold within this state for sowing purposes shall bear upon it or have attached to it in a conspicuous place a plainly written or printed label or tag in the English language that includes all of the following information:

(1) The commonly accepted name of the kind, kind and variety, or kind and type of each agricultural seed component in excess of 5 percent of the whole, and the percentage by weight of each. If the aggregate of agricultural seed components, each present in an amount not exceeding 5 percent of the whole, exceeds 10 percent of the whole, each component in excess of 1 percent of the whole shall be named together with the percentage by weight
 of each. If more than one component is required to be named, the names of all components shall be shown in letters of the same type and size.

(2) The lot number or other lot identification.

(3) The percentage by weight of all weed seeds.

(4) The name and approximate number of each kind of restricted noxious weed seed per pound.

(5) The percentage by weight of any agricultural seed except that which is required to be named on the label.

(6) The percentage by weight of inert matter. If a percentage by weight is required to be shown by any provision of this section, that percentage shall be exclusive of any substance that is added to the seed as a coating and shown on the label as such.

(7) For each agricultural seed in excess of 5 percent of the whole, stated in accordance with paragraph (1), the percentage of germination exclusive of hard seed, the percentage of hard seed, if present, and the calendar month and year the test was completed to determine the percentages. Following the statement of those percentages, the additional statement “total germination and hard seed” may be stated.

(8) The name and address of the person who labeled the seed or of the person who sells the seed within this state.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply in the following instances:

(1) The sale is an occasional sale of seed grain by the producer of the seed grain to their neighbor for use by the purchaser within the county of production.

(2) Any cannabis seed, as defined in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code, sold or offered for sale in the state.

(c) All determinations of noxious weed seeds are subject to tolerances and methods of determination prescribed in the regulations that are adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, “neighbor” means a person who lives in close proximity, not to exceed three miles, to another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 100.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

52453.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 52454, each container of vegetable seed that is for sale or sold within this state for sowing purposes shall bear upon it, or have attached to it, in a conspicuous place, a plainly written or printed label or tag in the English language, that gives all of the following information:

(a) Name of kind and variety of seed.

(b) For any seed that germinates less than the standard last established by the secretary under this chapter, the percentage of germination, exclusive of hard seed; the percentage of hard seed, if present; the calendar month and year the test was completed to determine those percentages; and the words “Below Standard” in not less than eight-point type.

(c) Name and address of the person that labeled the seed, or of the person that sells the seed within this state.

(d) In addition to the information required in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), on each container of more than one-half pound (227 grams), the label shall include both the lot number or other lot identification and the calendar month and year the germination test was completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52454.

Any lot of more than one container of seed which is transported to a dealer for resale, or any lot of more than five containers of seed which is sold to a consumer, is exempt from the requirements which are prescribed by Section 52452 or 52453 if both of the following requirements are complied with:

(a) Each container is plainly marked or identified with a lot number or other lot identification.

(b) The invoice and one or more of the containers bears the tag or label which is required by such sections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52455.

In addition to the labeling requirements of this article, all seed at the time of sale by a retail merchant for nonfarm usage, shall conspicuously bear upon the labeling of the seed a viability assurance statement.

(a) The statement shall be “SELL BY (month) (year),” or “USE BEFORE (month) (year)”. The month and year in the statement shall not exceed the 15-month retail time period allowed by subdivision (b) of Section 52481.

(b) The statement shall be conspicuous and in capital letters of the same size of type as other printed material on the labeling and contiguous to the germination date.

(c) The statement shall be affixed at the time of labeling for those containers destined for retail sales.

(d) For vegetable seed sold in containers of one-half pound (227 grams) or less, the viability assurance statement may read “Packed for (year) season” as an alternative to the “SELL BY (month) (year)” statements referenced in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52456.

In addition to the labeling requirements of this article, all seed, except seed at the time of sale by a retail merchant for nonfarm use, shall conspicuously bear upon the label adequate notice of the requirement to follow the conciliation, mediation, or arbitration procedures governing disputes between labelers and any person, as authorized by this chapter, and the consequences of failing to follow those procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Violations [52481. - 52489.]

52481.

Except as otherwise provided in this section or in Section 52486, it is unlawful for any person to ship, deliver, transport, or sell any agricultural or vegetable seed within this state, other than the seed that is described in Section 52451, unless the test to determine the percentage of germination that is required by Article 8 (commencing with Section 52451) has been completed within the following period, exclusive of the calendar month in which the test is completed, immediately prior to shipment, delivery, transportation, or sale:

(a) In the case of any agricultural or vegetable seed that is shipped, delivered, transported, or sold to a dealer for resale, eight months.

(b) In the case of any agricultural or vegetable seed that is sold at retail, 15 months.

(c) In the case of any agricultural or vegetable seed that is packaged under conditions that the secretary finds and determines will prolong the viability of the seed, the secretary may designate, in regulations that are adopted pursuant to this chapter, a longer period than otherwise specified in this section, and may require any additional labeling that may be necessary to maintain identification of seed that is packaged under these conditions.

(d) Seed labeled under Section 52455 is not subject to subdivision (b) upon expiration of the viability assurance statement. This exemption does not limit the right of the enforcing officer to enforce other applicable sections of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52482.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 52486, it is unlawful for any person to ship, deliver, transport, or sell any agricultural or vegetable seed within this state that is within any of the following classes:

(a) Is not labeled in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. This subdivision does not, however, apply to any seed that is described in Section 52451.

(b) Contains prohibited noxious weed seed, subject to tolerances and methods of determination prescribed in the regulations that are adopted pursuant to this chapter. This subdivision does not, however, apply to any of the seed that is described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 52451.

(c) Has false or misleading labeling, or pertaining to which there has been a false or misleading advertisement.

(d) Is represented to be certified seed or registered seed, unless it has been produced and labeled in accordance with the procedures and in compliance with the rules and regulations of a seed-certifying agency that is officially recognized under the provisions of this chapter, if produced in this state, or under the provisions of the Federal Seed Act (7 U.S.C., Sec. 1551, et seq.), as enacted, and rules and regulations that are adopted pursuant to that act, if produced outside of this state.

(e) Contains more than 112 percent by weight of all weed seeds. This subdivision does not, however, apply to any seed that is described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 52451.

(f) To sell, by variety name, seed not certified by an official seed-certifying agency when it is a variety for which a certificate of plant variety protection under the United States Plant Variety Protection Act (84 Stats. 1542; 7 U.S.C. Sec. 2321, et seq.) specifies sale only as a class of certified seed, except that seed from a certified lot may be labeled as to variety name when used in a mixture by, or with the written approval of the owner of the variety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52483.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Detach, alter, deface, or destroy any label, warning tag, or notice that is provided for in this chapter or in the regulations that are adopted pursuant to it, or alter or substitute seed, in a manner that may defeat the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Disseminate any false or misleading advertisement concerning agricultural or vegetable seed in any manner or by any means.

(c) Hinder or obstruct in any way any authorized person in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter.

(d) Fail to comply with a “stop-sale” order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52484.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 52486, it is unlawful for any person to ship, deliver, transport, or sell agricultural or vegetable seed that is treated after harvest with any substance that is likely to be poisonous or toxic to human beings or animals unless there is conspicuously shown on the analysis tag or label, on a separate tag or label attached to each container, or on each container all of the following information:

(1) “TREATED SEED” and the signal word for the category of treatment material, all in capital letters.

(2) The chemical or generic name of the treatment material.

(3) An appropriately worded statement as to the hazards to humans and animals.

(4) An appropriately worded statement of practical treatment, if present.

(b) This information shall be derived from the technical chemical label of each substance applied to the seed.

(c) When more than one substance is applied, each substance shall be noted on the label and the seed shall be labeled for each substance applied with the signal word for the substance with the highest level of toxicity.

(d) (1) For seeds treated with substances subject to the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and
 Rodenticide Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 136 et seq.), the label shall include, for each pesticide, the following information:

(A) The registration number from the United States Environmental Protection Agency, if applicable.

(B) The quantity applied by weight or amount per seed.

(2) This subdivision shall become operative January 1, 2027.

(3) This subdivision shall only apply to seeds shipped, delivered, transported, distributed, or sold in the state for planting within the state.

(4) The requirements of this subdivision do not apply to seeds packaged before January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   (AB 1042)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

52485.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or divert for use or for processing, either for human or animal consumption, any grain or other crop seed which is treated after harvest with any substance that is likely to be poisonous or toxic to human beings or animals, unless there is an established state or federal pesticide residue tolerance for such poisonous or toxic substance on the specific grain or crop seed, and such pesticide residue tolerance is not exceeded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52486.

Sections 52481, 52482, and 52484 of this article do not apply to any common carrier in respect to any seed which is transported or delivered for transportation in the ordinary course of its business as a carrier if such carrier is not engaged in conditioning or merchandising seed which is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

52487.

A violation of this chapter for having shipped, delivered, transported, or sold agricultural or vegetable seed that has false or misleading labeling shall be construed to have been committed at the time of discovery of the violation, and a complaint charging the violation shall be filed within one year from the time of discovery. No complaint that charges such a violation shall, however, be filed after two years from the date of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52488.

It is unlawful to violate any provisions of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------

52489.

It is unlawful for any person to violate the provisions of the United States Plant Variety Protection Act contained in Part J (commencing with Section 2531), Part K (commencing with Section 2541), or Part L (commencing with Section 2561) of Subchapter III of Chapter 57 of Title 7 of the United States Code, as enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Abatement [52511. - 52515.]

52511.

Any lot of agricultural or vegetable seed that does not comply with this chapter is a public nuisance and is subject to seizure on complaint of the secretary or the commissioner or any enforcing officer of this chapter to a court of competent jurisdiction in the area in which the seed is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 499, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

52512.

The district attorney of the county in which any such nuisance is found, on the relation of the director or the commissioner or any enforcing officer of this chapter, shall maintain, in the name of the people of the State of California, a civil action to abate and prevent such nuisance. Upon judgment and by order of the court, such nuisance shall be condemned and destroyed in the manner directed by the court, or relabeled, denatured, or otherwise processed, or released upon such conditions as the court in its discretion may impose to insure that the nuisance will be abated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

52513.

If the owner fails to comply with the order of the court within the time which is specified in the order, the court may order disposal of the seed and containers, or their sale, under those terms and conditions as the court may prescribe, by the director or the commissioner or any enforcing officer of this chapter, or by the sheriff or marshal. If the court orders the sale of any of the seed and containers which can be salvaged, the costs of disposal shall be deducted from the proceeds of sale and the balance paid into court for the owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

52514.

A proceeding pursuant to this article if the value of the property seized amounts to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) or less is a limited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 861, Sec. 12.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52515.

The director may, after hearing, refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke a registration for any violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter. Proceedings under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1051.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Seed Potato Certification [52651. - 52651.]



  ARTICLE 1. Seed Potato Certification Agencies [52651. - 52651.]

52651.

The secretary may, by regulation, designate as a seed potato certification agency, any person or agency that the secretary finds is qualified to certify seed potatoes as to their variety, quality, and freedom from pests and diseases. The secretary shall consult with the University of California and representatives of the seed potato industry of California before approving the qualifications of any seed potato certification agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 573, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. San Joaquin Valley Quality Cotton District [52851. - 52993.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [52851. - 52856.]

52851.

The Legislature hereby declares that the purposes of this chapter are to promote, encourage, aid, and protect the planting and growing of cotton in the State of California; that it believes that these purposes can best be accomplished by restricting within certain areas the planting and growing of but two types of cotton, which are Acala and Pima; that, by this means, it is possible to bring the cotton-growing industry in the state to its highest possible development and to ensure the growing of the most superior varieties of cotton; that the planting of pure seed is essential to the production of more marketable and better grades of cotton and cottonseeds, and for the production of grades of fiber best suited for manufacturing purposes; and that the planting of impure seeds or plants, other than those authorized in these areas, is an economic harm and loss to the planter thereof and an irreparable injury to the adjoining or neighboring growers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52852.

The Legislature also declares that the restriction of the use to which cotton lands and cotton gins may be used, as provided in this chapter, is essential to the highest development of the cotton-growing industry; otherwise the different types of seed will be mixed, crossing will take place in the field, the varieties will be mongrelized and cease to be uniform, the fiber will deteriorate in quality, and the seed will be rendered unfit for planting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52853.

The Legislature declares that the development of varieties or species of cotton which meet the desired quality of Acala or Pima cotton should be encouraged, if reasonable restrictions are imposed to prevent contamination and preserve integrity of the high quality cotton produced within the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 730, Sec. 3.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52854.

The production and marketing of Acala and Pima cotton produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 730, Sec. 3.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52855.

No action taken by the board, nor by an individual in accordance with this chapter or pursuant to the regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 730, Sec. 3.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52856.

The Legislature further declares that all cotton approved by the board for planting in the district is for the benefit of the cotton-growing industry and is not for the exclusive or limited use of any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [52861. - 52868.]

52861.

“Board” means the San Joaquin Valley Cotton Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 730, Sec. 4.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52862.

“Industry members” means cottonseed oil crushers, handlers of raw cotton fiber, and cotton ginners or employees thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52863.

“Handlers of raw cotton fiber” or “merchant” means any person or organization that is primarily engaged in the business of buying and selling spot cotton or forward contract cotton.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52864.

“Cotton ginning organization” means any person or organization owning or operating one or more cotton gins.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 592.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52865.

“District” means the “San Joaquin Valley Quality Cotton District” which is comprised of all the counties in the San Joaquin Valley where cotton is produced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 730, Sec. 5.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52866.

“Delinter” means any person who, by any means or method, causes the short fibers to be removed from the seed coat of cottonseed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 161, Sec. 6.   Effective July 15, 1987.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52867.

“Cotton growers” or “growers” means any person in the district who produces, or causes to be produced, cotton for market.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52868.

“Handlers of whole cottonseed” means any person or organization that is engaged in the business of buying, selling, or processing whole cottonseed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. San Joaquin Valley Cotton Board [52871. - 52890.]

52871.

There is in the state government the San Joaquin Valley Cotton Board. The board shall be composed of seven cotton growers, three cotton industry members operating in the San Joaquin Valley, and one public member.

(a) The grower members shall be elected by the cotton growers in the county they represent, as follows:

(1) There shall be five elected growers representing each of the five counties within the district with the largest cotton acreage.

(2) There shall be an additional elected grower from each of the two counties within the district with the largest cotton acreage.

(b) The three cotton industry members shall be elected as follows:

(1) One member elected from and by handlers of whole cottonseed.

(2) One member elected from and by handlers of raw cotton fiber.

(3) One member elected from and by cotton ginning organizations.

(4) An organization may not be represented in more than one of the categories specified in the foregoing paragraphs.

(c) One public member shall be appointed by the secretary. The board shall submit a list of three public members to the secretary. The secretary shall choose one public member from the list to serve as a member on the board. If the secretary determines that those on the list are unacceptable, the board shall submit a new list containing the names of three public members from which the secretary shall choose one. This procedure shall continue until a public member has been selected by the secretary to serve on the board.

(d) In addition, the board shall select one representative each from the United States Department of Agriculture and the University of California, and two representatives each from cotton planting seed delinting organizations, and organizations involved in the reproduction, sale, and distribution of cottonseed in the district, to serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the board. These members shall not be selected from the same organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52872.

The secretary shall establish a list of growers and other persons and organizations subject to this chapter. Each person or organization on the list shall have one vote in any election conducted pursuant to Sections 52871 and 52873 in which that person or organization is authorized to vote.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52873.

The secretary shall supervise and conduct any election held pursuant to Section 52871 and this section. Elections for grower members and elections for industry members shall be conducted as follows:

(a) The secretary shall distribute nomination petitions to each person or organization listed pursuant to Section 52872, and authorized to vote under Section 52871 in the election being held. The petition of signatures in support of a nominee signed by those whom the nominee represents shall be submitted to the secretary in order to nominate any candidate for election to the board within 30 days from the date of the secretary’s distribution of those petitions. There shall be at least 10 signatures on each petition of nomination for a cotton grower candidate, at least two signatures on each petition of nomination for handlers of whole cottonseed candidates, at least six signatures on each petition of nomination for handlers of raw cotton fiber candidates, and at least 10 signatures on each petition of nomination for cotton ginning candidates.

(b) The submitted petitions for nomination shall be verified by the secretary, and an election ballot containing the names of persons nominated shall thereafter be mailed to the persons and organizations eligible to vote in the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52874.

Each member of the board, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member, who shall be a candidate for election in the same manner as the member. The candidate receiving the greatest number of votes in the election for the vacant position shall be the member. The candidate with the next highest number of votes in the election for the vacant position shall be the alternate. In the event of a tie vote in electing members or alternates, the secretary, by lot, shall determine the member and alternate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52875.

An alternate member, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is alternate, shall sit in place of the member on the board, and shall have, and be able to exercise, all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when sitting on the board. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or the disqualification of a member, the alternate shall act as a member on the board for the remainder of the term.

If an alternate member is unable to continue serving in that position because he or she has replaced a member on the board or is unable to continue serving for any other reason, a new alternate shall be selected, by majority vote of the board. However, that person shall fulfill all the qualifications set forth in this article as required for the alternate member whose office he or she is to fill. Qualification of any person to fill vacancies on the board shall be certified, in writing, by the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 136, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52876.

Grower members and their alternates on the board shall have a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, cotton for market.

Cotton industry members or their alternates shall have a financial interest in, or be employed by, any person or organization handling cotton for markets.

The public member or his or her alternate on the board shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member on the board, but shall not have any direct financial interest in the cotton industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52878.

The term of office for each member, alternate, and ex officio member of the board is four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 433, Sec. 5.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52879.

Upon implementation of Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 52951), the board shall have the power to sue and be sued, and to enter into contracts. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when certified by the secretary of the board, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state, and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 189, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Conditionally inoperative on January 1, 2014, as prescribed in Section 52991.)
-------------------------------------------

52880.

The board may appoint its own officers, including a chairman, one or more vice chairmen, and such other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties as may be delegated to them by the board.
